Wyoming statutes. Title 41 Water
Division 1. Generally

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Complexities of Managing Hydrologically Connected Surface Water and Groundwater Under the Appropriation Doctrine,” see XXII Land & Water L. Rev. 63 (1987).

For article, “Wyoming's Groundwater Laws: Quantity and Quality Regulation,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 39 (1989).

For article, “A Critical Look at Wyoming Water Law,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 307 (1989).

§ 41-3-901.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

41-3-901

through

41-3-938

], unless the context plainly otherwise requires:

“Person” means a natural person, partnership, association, corporation, municipality, irrigation district, the state of Wyoming, any agency or political subdivision thereof, and the United States or any agency thereof;

“Underground water” means any water, including hot water and geothermal steam, under the surface of the land or the bed of any stream, lake, reservoir, or other body of surface water, including water that has been exposed to the surface by an excavation such as a pit;

“Aquifer” means any underground geological structure or formation having boundaries that may be ascertained or reasonably inferred, in which water stands, flows or percolates;

“Well” means any artificial opening or excavation in the ground, however made, by which underground water is sought or through which it flows under natural pressure or is artificially withdrawn, and a series of wells developed as a unit and pumped collectively by a single pumping unit shall be considered as one (1) well;

“Construction” of a well includes boring, drilling, jetting, digging or excavating, and installing casing, pump and other devices for withdrawing or facilitating the withdrawal of underground water, or measuring the depth to the water table or the flow of the well;

“Pollution” of underground water means any impairment of the natural quality of such water, however caused, including impairment by salines, minerals, industrial wastes, domestic wastes or sewage, whether indrafted directly or through infiltration into the underground water supply;

“Additional supply” means underground water for irrigation use which is appurtenant to lands that have a direct flow supply of surface water or have an original supply from another underground water source. The limit of use of additional supply is beneficial use;

“Hydrothermal system” means a groundwater system, including cold water recharge and transmission and warm and hot water discharge;

“Hydrothermal feature” means a surface manifestation of a hydrothermal system, including, but not limited to, hot springs, geysers, mud pots and fumaroles.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 27; W.S. 1957, § 41-121; Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 2; 1995, ch. 206, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Quoted

in

Town of Pine Bluffs v. State Bd. of Control, 647 P.2d 1365,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 354

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Rights of Wyoming Appropriators in Underground Water,” see 1 Wyo. L.J. 111.

For note, “‘Water Mining’ and Wyoming Law,” see 17 Wyo. L.J. 232 (1963).

For article, “Geothermal Resources: A Primer for the Practitioner,” see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 327 (1974).

For article, “Water That Is Not Water,” see XIII Land & Water L. Rev. 391 (1978).

For article, “Percentage Depletion for Geothermal Energy: An Alternative Method for Calculation of Gross Income,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 427 (1980).

For article, “The Challenge of Mine Dewatering to Western Water Law and the New Mexico Response,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 445 (1980).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability for injury to property occasioned by water flowing from well, 19 ALR2d 1025.

Loss by nonuser of private easement as to well, 25 ALR2d 1265.

Liability for obstruction or diversion of subterranean waters in use of land, 29 ALR2d 1354.

Liability for pollution of subterranean waters, 38 ALR2d 1265.

Liability of landowner withdrawing groundwater from own land for subsidence of adjoining owner's land, 5 ALR4th 614.

Measure and elements of damages for pollution of well or spring, 76 ALR4th 629.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §§ 113.08, 133.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 41-3-902.
Spring waters; perfection of right to use; limitation.

All springs and spring waters where the yield does not exceed twenty-five (25) gallons per minute and where the use is for domestic or stock purposes only, shall be considered as groundwater. Perfection of the right to use spring water up to twenty-five (25) gallons per minute for domestic or stock use shall be made in accordance with the laws pertaining to groundwater.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-121.1.

§ 41-3-903.
By-product water; definition.

By-product water is water which has not been put to prior beneficial use, and which is a by-product of some nonwater-related economic activity and has been developed only as a result of such activity. By-product water includes, but is not limited to, water resulting from the operation of oil well separator systems or mining activities such as dewatering of mines.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-121.2.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Water Saved or Water Lost: The Consequences of Individual Conservation Measures in the Appropriation States,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1976).

§ 41-3-904.
By-product water; appropriation; conditions and limitation.

Any person intending to appropriate by-product water for beneficial use shall file an application with the state engineer on the forms and in the manner prescribed for groundwater applications. By-product water shall be considered as being in the same class as groundwater for the purposes of administration and control. An application may be filed only if both the following conditions exist:

The by-product water is intercepted while it is readily identifiable and before it has commingled with the waters of any live stream, lake, reservoir or other surface watercourse, or part of any groundwater aquifer; and

The developer of the water is the applicant, or an agreement is filed in the office of the state engineer wherein the developer of the water gives the applicant permission to use the water as proposed in the application. The agreement must be signed by the developer of the water, and may contain provisions for reservation of the water to the use of the developer-grantor, and if so stipulated, the reservation can be superior in right and title to any use by the applicant-grantee.

In all other cases, an application to appropriate by-product water shall be governed by the laws pertaining to surface water, and by-product water shall be considered as part of the surface supply, subject to use by existing priority rights.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-121.3.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “Water Saved or Water Lost: The Consequences of Individual Conservation Measures in the Appropriation States,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 435 (1976).

§ 41-3-905.
Application; generally; registration of vested rights; permit to construct well; registration of formerly exempted wells.

Nothing herein contained shall be construed so as to interfere with the right of any person to use water from any existing well where such water is economically and beneficially used for irrigation or for municipal, railway, industrial or other beneficial use, to the extent only that such continued right does not injuriously affect existing adjudicated surface rights not heretofore abandoned, and such use is hereby declared to constitute a vested right, provided, that the owner of any such right acquired before April 1, 1947, must have filed with the state engineer the statement required by W.S.

41-3-901

through

41-3-938

, on or before December 31, 1957, and the owner of any right acquired on or after April 1, 1947, must have registered his well with the state engineer as required by W.S.

41-3-901

through

41-3-938

, prior to the effective date of this act, and provided further, that the right to take underground water from any well exempted from the provisions of W.S. 41-3-901 through 41-3-938, that is not exempted from the provisions of this act, and that shall be registered with the state engineer prior to the effective date of this act, shall also constitute a vested right in the use of water with priority as of the time of completion of the well. No well shall be constructed after the effective date of this act unless a permit has been obtained from the state engineer. All existing stock and domestic wells formerly exempted may be registered with the state engineer prior to December 31, 1972. The state engineer shall make appropriate forms for such registration available with each county clerk and at such other places as he deems feasible.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 41-122; Laws 1969, ch. 213, § 1.

§ 41-3-906.
Application; rights subject to preferences; rights of municipal corporations.

Rights to underground water shall be subject to the same preferences as provided by law for surface waters, and rights not preferred may be condemned and changed to a preferred use in the manner provided by law for surface waters. Nothing herein contained shall be construed to impair the rights of municipal corporations to acquire any underground water or underground water rights for a necessary public purpose by eminent domain or condemnation proceedings.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 24; W.S. 1957, § 41-123.

Library references. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
133.02 (Matthew Bender).

§ 41-3-907.
Application; preferred right of appropriations for stock or domestic use.

Appropriations of underground water for stock or domestic use, the latter being defined as household use and the watering of lawns and gardens for noncommercial family use where the area to be irrigated does not exceed one (1) acre, where the yield or flow does not exceed .056 cubic feet per second or twenty-five (25) gallons per minute, shall have a preferred right over rights for all other uses, regardless of their dates of priority, subject to the provisions of W.S.

41-3-911

, as amended, if an appropriation is for two (2) or more uses, and includes one (1) of the above preferred uses, the preferred use shall be limited to .056 cubic feet per second or twenty-five (25) gallons per minute, and the application shall specify one (1) acre upon which such preferred uses shall be made. Such preferred use shall not include municipal use by any person of water appropriated by a municipality or company, or any instance where water is purchased or held out for sale.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 41-124; Laws 1969, ch. 213, § 2.

Cited

in

Bishop v. City of Casper, 420 P.2d 446,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1966).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

§ 41-3-908.
Division advisory committee; appointment; removal; duties; expense allowances.

In each of the water divisions of the state, as defined in W.S.

41-3-501

, there shall be established a division advisory committee on underground water. Each committee shall consist of three (3) persons, appointed by the governor, who shall in making such appointments, select persons who, in his opinion, will adequately represent the landowners and water users of the division, the geographical areas of the division and the public interest. The first committee in each division shall consist of one (1) member appointed for a term of two (2) years, one (1) member appointed for a term of four (4) years, and one (1) member appointed for a term of six (6) years. Their successors shall each be appointed for a term of six (6) years. The governor may remove any member of any advisory committee as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The duties of the division advisory committee on underground water are:

To call and supervise the election of the members of control area advisory boards;

To assist and advise the state engineer and the board regarding policies that affect the underground water of this state, such assistance and advice to consider both the interests of underground water users and the interests of the general public;

To provide advice and assistance to the state engineer and superintendents in arriving at solutions to underground water problems as they arise within the water division;

To provide advice and assistance to control area advisory boards, particularly in the development of control measures which are recommended to the state engineer for adoption;

To provide underground water users within the division with information relative to the policies and procedures of the state engineer and board which affect the use of underground water.

The members of each of the division advisory committees shall receive the same per diem, mileage and expense allowances while attending and traveling to and from control area board meetings and other official business of the committee in the same manner and amount as employees of the state.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 41-125; Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 2; 1977, ch. 101, § 1; 1987, ch. 175, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to hearings before state engineer and control area advisory board, see §

41-3-932

.

Cited

in

Bishop v. City of Casper, 420 P.2d 446,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1966).

§ 41-3-909.
State engineer; powers generally.

In the administration and enforcement of this act [§§

41-3-901

through

41-3-938

] and in the effectuation of the policy of the state to conserve its underground water resources, the state engineer is authorized and empowered on advice and consent of the board of control:

To prescribe such rules and regulations as may be necessary or desirable to enable him to efficiently administer this act;

To require such reports from well drillers as may be necessary or desirable;

To require such annual reports from underground water users as may be necessary or desirable;

To make such investigations as may be necessary or desirable, and to cooperate in such investigations with agencies of the United States, agencies of this state or any other state, political subdivision of this state, any public or private corporation, or any association or individual;

To make regulations concerning the spacing, distribution and location of wells in critical areas;

To establish standards for the construction of wells, to work with the division advisory board, governmental subdivisions, and water user organizations to encourage the adoption of local standards of beneficial use and methods of conveyance and application of water designed to conserve and prevent waste of supplies;

To require, whenever practical, all flowing wells to be so capped or equipped that the flow of water can be stopped when the wells are not in use, and to require both flowing and nonflowing wells to be so constructed and maintained as to prevent the waste of underground water either above or below the land surface;

To require the abatement of any condition, or the sealing of any well, responsible for the admission of polluting materials into an underground water supply;

To delegate any of the duties and powers imposed or granted by this act, to the deputy state engineer or to an assistant state engineer, or other qualified member of his staff;

To bring suit to enjoin the construction of illegal wells or the withdrawal or use of water therefrom, or to enforce any of the provisions of this act or of orders issued thereunder, and to intervene in any action or proceeding when it appears that the determination of such action or proceeding may result in the depletion of underground water resources of the state contrary to the policy expressed in this act.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 25; W.S. 1957, § 41-126; Laws 1969, ch. 213, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Bishop v. City of Casper, 420 P.2d 446,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1966).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For article, “The Challenge of Mine Dewatering to Western Water Law and the New Mexico Response,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 445 (1980).

For comment, “Sporhase v. Nebraska ex rel. Douglas: State Control of Water Under the Constraints of the Commerce Clause,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1983).

§ 41-3-910.
State engineer; power to determine area and boundaries of districts.

The state engineer is authorized and directed to determine the area and boundaries of districts overlying the various aquifers yielding underground waters in this state and to assign to each district a distinctive name or number. He may establish subdistricts when parts of an aquifer require or may require separate regulations from the rest. He may alter the boundaries of such districts and subdistricts at any time. He may establish different districts for different aquifers that overlie each other in whole or in part.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 41-127.

§ 41-3-911.
Authority to order interfering appropriator to cease withdrawals of water; hearing complaints by appropriators.

Whenever a well withdrawing water for beneficial purposes shall interfere unreasonably with an adequate well developed solely for domestic or stock uses as defined in W.S.

41-3-907

, whether in a control area or not, the state engineer may, on complaint of the operator of the stock or domestic well, order the interfering appropriator to cease or reduce withdrawals of underground water, unless such appropriator shall furnish at his own expense, sufficient water at the former place of use to meet the need for domestic or stock use. In case of interference between two (2) wells utilizing water for stock or domestic use as defined in W.S.

41-3-907

, the appropriation with the earliest priority shall have the better right.

Any appropriator of either surface or underground water may file a written complaint alleging interference with his water right by a junior right. Complaints are to be filed with the state engineer and are to be accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) to help defray costs of investigation. This section is not applicable to interference between two (2) surface water rights. Upon receiving the complaint and fee, the state engineer shall undertake an investigation to determine if the alleged interference does exist. Following the investigation, the state engineer shall issue a report to all interested parties stating his findings. The report may suggest various means of stopping, rectifying or ameliorating the interference or damage caused thereby.

Any interested appropriator who is dissatisfied with the results of the foregoing procedure may proceed under the applicable provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

]. If a hearing is to be held, it shall be held before the appropriate water division superintendent. The superintendent shall report to the board of control at its next meeting. The board shall issue its order to include findings of fact and conclusions of law.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 41-128; Laws 1961, ch. 211, § 1; 1969, ch. 213, § 4; 1973, ch. 171, § 2.

This section gives relief only for “an adequate well.”

Bishop v. Casper, 420 P.2d 446,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1966) (commented on in II Land & Water L. Rev. 469 (1967)).

Complaint must allege that well is adequate.

Bishop v. Casper, 420 P.2d 446,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1966) (commented on in II Land & Water L. Rev. 469 (1967)).

Otherwise, such complaint is defective.

Bishop v. Casper, 420 P.2d 446,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 1966) (commented on in II Land & Water L. Rev. 469 (1967)).

“Preponderance-of-the-evidence” standard applicable. —

Under subsection (c) and the applicable provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act, the standard applicable to an adjudicatory hearing before the board of control, unless otherwise stated, is the “preponderance of the evidence” standard customarily used in civil cases. Willadsen v. Christopulos, 731 P.2d 1181,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 387

(Wyo. 1987).

Interference not proven. —

There was substantial evidence in the record to support the board's conclusion that a surface water appropriator did not prove the existence of interference, where the groundwater hydrologist who designed the interference test for the investigation testified that pumpage of the well in question did not have a measurable or observable effect on the creek in question, and the petitioner's witnesses primarily based their testimony on the same data used by the state's witnesses and concluded that interference existed. Wyoming State Eng'r v. Willadsen, 792 P.2d 1376,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 1990).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Challenge of Mine Dewatering to Western Water Law and the New Mexico Response,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 445 (1980).

§ 41-3-912.
Control areas; board member districts; designation; redesignation; duty of state engineer; hearings.

“Control area” means any underground water district or subdistrict that has been so designated by the board of control. The board of control may designate a control area for the following reasons:

The use of underground water is approaching a use equal to the current recharge rate;

Ground water levels are declining or have declined excessively;

Conflicts between users are occurring or are foreseeable;

The waste of water is occurring or may occur; or

Other conditions exist or may arise that require regulation for the protection of the public interest.

Whenever the engineer has information leading him to believe that any underground water district or subdistrict should become a control area, he shall immediately report in writing to the board of control all information known by him with reference to said area.

The board of control shall fix a time and place to consider the information supplied by the state engineer and hear any other evidence presented at the time of the hearing. At the conclusion of the hearing, the board of control shall issue an order declaring that the area in question is or is not to be a control area. If the board determines that a control area needs to be created, it shall define the area geographically and stratigraphically. The board of control may designate five (5) board member districts for the purpose of the election of the control area advisory board.

On the petition of five (5) persons owning or entitled by public land filing to the possession of land within the control area, or upon the recommendation of the state engineer, the board of control may consider the redesignation of the geographic or stratigraphic boundaries of a control area. If redesignation is considered, the board shall fix a time and place to hear the information supplied by the petitioners, the state engineer or other interested persons. Within ninety (90) days of the hearing, the board shall issue its order. If a control area is redesignated geographically, the board shall determine whether to divide the area into board member districts pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.

On the petition of five (5) persons owning or entitled by public land filing to the possession of land within the control area, the control area advisory board shall consider the designation or redesignation of board member districts. If the control area advisory board determines that board member districts should be designated or redesignated, it shall submit its recommendation to the board of control for approval.

The action of the board of control in denying at any time a petition or recommendation for redesignation is final and not subject to review.

Whenever a control area has been designated or redesignated the state engineer may, without hearings or other proceedings, refuse to grant permits for the drilling of any wells within the control area.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 41-129; Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 2; 1981, ch. 6, § 1.

Law reviews. —

For comment, “‘It's Our Water!’ — Can Wyoming Constitutionally Prohibit the Exportation of State Waters?” see X Land & Water L. Rev. 119 (1975).

For article, “The Challenge of Mine Dewatering to Western Water Law and the New Mexico Response,” see XV Land & Water L. Rev. 445 (1980).

For comment, “Sporhase v. Nebraska ex rel. Douglas: State Control of Water Under the Constraints of the Commerce Clause,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 513 (1983).

§ 41-3-913.
Control areas; election of control area advisory board; mileage and expense allowances.

When an underground water district or subdistrict is declared to be a control area, when the board of control geographically redesignates a control area or when the board of control approves the recommendation of a control area advisory board that board member districts be designated or redesignated, a control area advisory board shall be created in the manner provided herein. The control area advisory board shall consist of five (5) adults who own land or underground water rights, or who are the officers, officials or members of the board of a corporation which owns land or underground water rights within the control area. The board shall represent the entire control area.

The state engineer shall notify the division advisory committee of the division in which the control area is located, of the designation or redesignation of the control area. Within twenty (20) days of notification, the division advisory committee shall select a nominating committee of not less than three (3) persons entitled to vote in the election of the control area advisory board. The nominating committee shall nominate not less than five (5) persons for election to the control area advisory board or, if board member districts have been established, it shall nominate at least one (1) person for election in each district. Within thirty (30) days of its selection, the nominating committee shall report its nominations to the division advisory committee. The division advisory committee shall call an election of members of the control area advisory board, to be held within forty (40) days from the date of the report. The call of the election shall state the time, the place within the control area, the purpose of the election, and the names of persons nominated for election. It shall be published for two (2) consecutive weeks at least twenty (20) days prior to the election in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which a part of the control area or board member district lies.

Every person or corporation owning or, by virtue of public land filing, entitled to possession of land which is a part of the control area is entitled to cast for each member to be elected one (1) vote for each acre of such land as assessed upon the last annual assessment roll of the county in which the land is located, or as shown by the public land filing. A person owning a tract of land of less than one (1) acre is entitled to cast one (1) vote for each member to be elected. The grantee or assignee of the water in or under any described land is entitled to vote, as prescribed herein, in the place of the person or corporation owning or entitled to the possession of the land. However, if board member districts are established, only the votes which derive from within each district shall be cast in the election of the district board member.

At the hour and place of the election the division advisory committee shall call the roll of those entitled to vote, and the number of votes each is entitled to. They shall make a record of the qualified voters present, receive all proxies and prescribe the method of canvassing the votes. All proxies shall be in writing and signed by the person entitled to vote. The five (5) persons receiving the highest number of votes, or the person receiving the highest number of votes within each board member district, shall be declared to be elected, regardless of whether or not they have received a majority of votes cast. No election shall be invalid because a majority of the acreage of the control area or board member district was not represented at the election. Two (2) of the members so elected shall serve until one (1) year from the third Tuesday in July of the year following the election, and three (3) of the members so elected shall serve until two (2) years following such date. The division advisory committee shall decide by lot which members shall serve for these terms.

During the first fifteen (15) days of July next preceding the expiration of the term of any member an election shall be held to elect members of the control area advisory board. The control area advisory board shall call and conduct the election in the same manner prescribed for the first election. Members elected at any election after the first election shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Whenever the office of any member becomes vacant for any cause, a person to fill the vacancy of the unexpired term shall be appointed by the remaining members. The costs of elections shall be paid by the state engineer’s office.

Each member of the control area advisory board shall receive the same per diem, mileage and expense allowances while attending and traveling to and from meetings of the board and other official business of the board in the same manner and amount as employees of the state. No person shall represent more than one (1) board member district during any term of office, and no person shall serve on a control area advisory board for more than two (2) consecutive terms.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 41-130; Laws 1971, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 13; 1973, ch. 171, § 2; ch. 213, § 2; 1977, ch. 102, § 1; 1981, ch. 6, § 1.

§ 41-3-914.
Adjudication of waters within control area.

After the boundaries of any control area have been determined by the board, the appropriate superintendent shall proceed with the adjudication of unadjudicated wells within the control area. After completing the adjudication, the superintendent shall hold evidence of the adjudication open for inspection by the public at a time and place to be fixed by the superintendent, and notice thereof shall be published in two (2) issues of a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties where the control area is situated.

If any well owner, lessee or user within a control area refuses to adjudicate a well, or supply the necessary information to permit adjudication of any well, the superintendent may tag and lock the pump or well to prevent use of water therefrom. The penalty for interfering with the tag or lock on a well is as provided in W.S.

41-3-616

. The use of water from a well so tagged and locked is prima facie evidence that the well owner, lessee or user has violated the provisions of this section.

The taking of proof, filing objections or contests, giving notices, conducting of hearings, making adjudications of water rights, determining of priorities as between appropriators, issuing of certificate of appropriation, and taking appeals shall, insofar as applicable, and not in conflict with the provisions of this act [§§

41-3-901

through

41-3-938

] be governed by the provisions of W.S.

41-4-101

through

41-4-207

and

41-4-211

through

41-4-517

.

At the first regular meeting of the board after completion of such proof and advertisement, the board shall cause to be entered in the records of its office an order showing the priorities of right to the use of water in the control area, the amount of appropriation of the parties claiming water therefrom, the character and kind of use for which the appropriation is made, and the places or points of use. The secretary of the board shall issue to each person represented in the determination, a certificate of appropriation signed by the president of the board and attested under seal of the secretary of the board which shall state the name and post-office address of the appropriator, the priority date of the appropriation, the amount of water appropriated, the use to which the water has been applied and, if the appropriation is for irrigation, a description of the legal subdivision of land to which the water is applied, or the place of use if the appropriation is not being used for irrigation. The certificate shall be transmitted by certified mail to the county clerk of the county in which the appropriation has been made and the county clerk shall, upon receipt of the proper fee, record the same and thereupon immediately transmit the certificate to the appropriator. At the time of the submission of final proof of appropriation before the state engineer or superintendent of a water division, a fee not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100.00) shall be collected, which shall be used for advertising the proof of appropriation and recording the certificate. The priority of appropriation shall be the determining factor in adjudicating underground water; the person first making the appropriation being first entitled to the use of the underground water, except as modified by W.S.

41-3-933

.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 15; W.S. 1957, § 41-131; Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 2; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1993, ch. 123, § 1; 2005, ch. 82, § 2; 2017 ch. 99, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “W.S.

41-3-616

” for “W.S.

41-3-938

” in (b).

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (d), substituted “one hundred dollars ($100.00)” for “fifty dollars ($50.00).”

Law reviews. —

For article, “Underground Water,” see 4 Wyo. L.J. 193.

§ 41-3-915.
Control areas; hearing to determine adequacy of water for all appropriators; corrective controls generally; agreements in lieu of controls.

After designation of an area as a control area by the board, the state engineer may temporarily adopt any of the corrective controls provided for by this section, where it appears that immediate regulation is required. After the well adjudication procedure has been completed, the state engineer may, on his own motion, and shall on the petition of twenty (20) appropriators or of one-tenth of the appropriators of water from a control area, cause a hearing to be held before the state engineer and the control area advisory board to determine whether the underground water in the area is adequate for the needs of all appropriators of underground water in such area. Public notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be published once in a newspaper circulated in the area not more than thirty (30) days before the time set for the meeting. If the state engineer finds after the hearing, and after receiving the advice of the control area advisory board, that the underground water in the control area is insufficient for all of the appropriators, he may by order adopt one (1) or more of the following corrective controls:

He may close the controlled area to any further appropriation of underground water, in which event he shall thereafter refuse to grant any applications for a permit to appropriate underground water in that area, provided, that such area may be reopened to appropriations at any time the state engineer shall find on the basis of additional evidence that there is unappropriated water in the area, in which event the state engineer shall reconsider all applications for permits refused on the grounds of the order closing the area;

He may determine the permissible total withdrawal of underground water in the control area for each day, month or year, and, insofar as may be reasonably done, he shall apportion such permissible total withdrawal among the appropriators holding valid rights to the underground water in the control area in accordance with the relative dates of priority of such rights;

If he finds that withdrawals by junior appropriators have a material and adverse effect upon the supply available for and needed by senior appropriators, he may order such junior appropriators to cease or reduce withdrawals forthwith;

If he finds that cessation or reduction of withdrawals by junior appropriators will not result in proportionate benefits to senior appropriators, he may require and specify a system of rotation of use of underground water in the controlled area;

He may institute well spacing requirements if permits are granted to develop new wells.

The state engineer shall cause a copy of any such order to be served upon each person affected thereby in the manner provided for service of process in civil actions.

Appropriators of underground water from a control area may agree to any method or scheme of control of withdrawals, well spacing, apportionment, rotation or proration of the common supply of underground water. The state engineer shall encourage and promote such agreements and supply the parties with information and advice. When the state engineer, with the advice of the control area advisory board, shall find that any such agreement, executed in writing and filed in his office, is consistent with the intent, purposes and requirements of this act [§§

41-3-901

through

41-3-938

], and would not be detrimental to the public interest or to the rights of other persons not parties to the agreement, he shall approve the agreement, and thereafter such agreement shall control, until terminated as hereinafter provided, in lieu of any order issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section.

Any agreement approved by the state engineer may be terminated by the terms of the agreement, by the consent of the parties, or by order of the state engineer if he finds, after investigation and a public hearing before the control area advisory board, held at least two (2) weeks after one (1) published notice in a newspaper of general circulation in each county in which a part of the control area lies, that the agreement is not being substantially complied with by the parties, or that changed conditions have made the agreement inequitable, or that the continuance of the agreement is no longer consistent with the intent, purpose and requirements of this act, or is a detriment to the public interest or to the rights of other persons not parties to the agreement.

History.

Laws 1957, ch. 169, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 41-132; Laws 1973, ch. 171, § 2.

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Water Law — A Postscript to the Mutual Prescription Doctrine — City of Los Angeles v. City of San Fernando, 14 Cal. 3d 199, 537 P.2d 1250, 1975 Cal. LEXIS 286, 123 Cal. Rptr. 1 (1975),” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 131 (1976).